District of Columbia statutes.
29-808.06

Proceeds and expenses.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section:

(1)

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action under § 29-808.02, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited liability company and not to the plaintiff; and

(2)

If the plaintiff receives any proceeds, the plaintiff shall remit them immediately to the company.

(b)

If a derivative action under § 29-808.02 is successful in whole or in part, the Superior Court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, from the recovery of the limited liability company.

(c)

A derivative action on behalf of a limited partnership may not be voluntarily dismissed or settled without the Superior Court’s approval.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(9)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added (c).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 906 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.